Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1599
Department; powers and duties.

The department shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties to carry out the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act:

(1) Develop a program for the regulation of disposal of low-level radioactive waste based on a zero-release objective;

(2) Issue, modify, suspend, or revoke licenses or orders;

(3) Advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, the federal government, other states and interstate agencies, political subdivisions, and other organizations concerned with control of sources of radiation;

(4) Accept and administer loans, grants, or other funds or gifts, conditional or otherwise, in furtherance of its functions, from the federal government and from other sources, public or private;

(5) Enter upon any private or public property at all reasonable times to determine compliance with the act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;

(6) Institute training programs to qualify personnel to administer the act and make such personnel available for participation in any programs of the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies in furtherance of the purposes of the act;

(7) Enter into agreements with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies by which the department agrees to perform inspections and other functions relating to the disposal of low-level radioactive waste on a cooperative basis with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies;

(8) Require submission of plans, specifications, and other data for siting, construction, and operation of a facility;

(9) Require proper operation and maintenance of a facility;

(10) Require licensees (a) to keep detailed records of each and every release which may cause or contribute to air, water, or land pollution or to the exposure to the environment of radioactive or hazardous substances, (b) to inform the department of each such event within twenty-four hours of its occurrence, and (c) to make such records available for inspection by the department, the public, and other interested persons;

(11) Require licensees to adopt low-level radioactive waste technological and operative procedures consistent with a zero-release objective; and

(12) Exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 22;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 9.